Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-6502
Act; purpose; applicability.

(1) The purpose of the Pet Insurance Act is to promote the public welfare by creating a comprehensive legal framework within which pet insurance may be sold in this state.

(2) The requirements of the Pet Insurance Act shall apply to pet insurance policies that are issued to any resident of this state and are sold, solicited, negotiated, or offered in this state and pet insurance policies or certificates that are delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

(3) All other applicable provisions of the insurance laws of this state shall continue to apply to pet insurance, except that the specific provisions of the Pet Insurance Act shall supersede any general provisions of law that would otherwise be applicable to pet insurance.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 2.